California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 first had and obtained.

(e) The construction, making, verification of shade taking, alteration or repairing of bridges, crowns, dentures, or other prosthetic appliances, or orthodontic appliances, when the casts or impressions for this work have been made or taken by a licensed dentist, but a written authorization signed by a licensed dentist shall accompany the order for the work or it shall be performed in the office of a licensed dentist under the dentist’s supervision. The burden of proving written authorization or direct supervision is upon the person charged with the violation of this chapter.

It is unlawful for any person acting under the exemption of this subdivision to represent or hold out to the public in any manner that the person will perform or render any of the services exempted by
 this subdivision that are rendered or performed under the provisions of this chapter by a licensed dentist, including the construction, making, alteration or repairing of dental prosthetic or orthodontic appliances.

(f) The manufacture or sale of wholesale dental supplies.

(g) The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene by applicants during a licensing examination conducted in this state by the licensing agency of another state which does not have a dental school; provided, however, that the consent of the board to the conducting of the examination shall first have been obtained and that the examination shall be conducted in a dental college accredited by the board.

(h) The practice by personnel of the Air Force, Army,
 Coast Guard, Navy, or Marine Corps or employees of the United States Public Health Service, Veterans’ Administration, or Bureau of Indian Affairs when engaged in the discharge of official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 24.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.1.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in Section 1626, the operations by bona fide students of registered dental assisting, registered dental assisting in extended functions, and registered dental hygiene in extended functions in the clinical departments or the laboratory of an educational program or school approved by the board, including operations by unlicensed students while engaged in clinical externship programs that have been approved by an approved educational program or school, and that are under the general programmatic and academic supervision of that educational program or school, are exempt from the operation of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1626.5 (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.2.

An individual licensed to practice dentistry under this chapter is a licentiate for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 805, and thus is a health care practitioner subject to the provisions of Section 2290.5 pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 25.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.5.

(a) A licensed dentist, or group of dentists, or dental corporation shall not share in any fee charged by a person for performing acupuncture or receive anything of value from or on behalf of such acupuncturist for any referral or diagnosis.

(b) A licensed dentist shall not employ more than one person to perform acupuncture services.

(c) A group of dentists or a dental corporation
 shall not employ more than one person to perform acupuncture services for every 20 dentists in such group or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 267.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.6.

(a) (1) In addition to the exemptions set forth in Section 1626, the practice of dentistry by a dental student rendered or performed without compensation or expectation of compensation under the supervision of a licensed dentist with a clinical faculty appointment at a sponsored event, is exempt from the operation of this chapter.

(2) The practice of dentistry exempted by paragraph (1) only includes those operations, approved by the board, that are rendered or performed under the same conditions as operations exempt under subdivision (b) of Section 1626.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following
 shall apply:

(1) “Dental student” means a person who has begun clinical training at a dental school approved by the board.

(2) “Licensed dentist” means a dentist licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(3) “Patient” means a dental patient or, in the case of a minor, the patient’s representative.

(4) “Sponsored event” means an event, not to exceed 10 calendar days, administered by a sponsoring entity or a local governmental entity, or both, through which health care is provided to the public without compensation or expectation of compensation.

(5) “Sponsoring dental school” means a dental school that sanctions
 student and clinical faculty participation at a sponsored event.

(6) “Sponsoring entity” means a nonprofit organization pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a community-based organization.

(c) The volunteer practice of dentistry by students pursuant to this section shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Each patient shall be sufficiently informed that a dental student may be providing some of the treatment that the patient will be receiving.

(2) Any information provided to the patient to give informed consent shall offer the patient the option to decline to be treated by the student.

(3) The volunteer practice of a student shall be supervised by clinical faculty from the dental school in which the student is enrolled.

(4) Each volunteer student shall wear an identification badge that clearly identifies the student as a dental student. The identification badge shall display the student’s name, the name of the student’s dental school, and the name and the telephone number of the Dental Board of California. That information shall be displayed in 14-point font, at minimum.

(5) Supervision ratios and student oversight shall be at least as stringent as the standards set for the procedure being performed by the student and the age of the patient, in accordance with the standards at the sponsoring dental
 school’s clinical department, laboratory, or dental extension program operated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1626.

(6) (A) The student shall perform only those procedures in which the student is credentialed or those procedures the student is permitted to perform in the school’s clinical department, laboratory, or dental extension program operated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1626.

(B) For any clinical procedures, the designated supervising faculty shall be responsible for assessing the patient treated by a student and determining if the assigned student has the skill level necessary to provide that patient care.

(d) The student or the student’s sponsoring dental school shall ensure
 liability insurance coverage is obtained that covers all services provided by the student, including diagnosis, treatment, and evaluation.

(e) The sponsoring entity of the sponsored event shall provide the Dental Board of California with a list of the names of the students practicing dentistry exempted by this section at the sponsored event, the name of the school of enrollment of those students, and the name and license number of the supervising licensed dentist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   (AB 936)   Effective October 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1627.

The license of any dentist, existing at the time of the passage of this chapter, shall continue in force until it expires or is forfeited in the manner provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 380, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1627.5.

(a) A person licensed under this chapter, who in good faith renders emergency care at the scene of an emergency occurring outside the place of that person’s practice, or who, upon the request of another person so licensed, renders emergency care to a person for a complication arising from prior care of another person so licensed, shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by that person in rendering the emergency care.

(b) A person licensed under this chapter who voluntarily and without compensation or expectation of compensation, and consistent with the dental education and emergency training that
 the person has received, provides emergency medical care to a person during a state of emergency declared pursuant to a proclamation issued pursuant to Section 8588, 8625, or 8630 of the Government Code or a declaration of health emergency issued pursuant to Section 101080 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be liable in negligence for any personal injury, wrongful death, or property damage caused by the licensee’s good faith but negligent act or omission. This subdivision shall not provide immunity for acts or omissions of gross negligence or willful misconduct. This subdivision does not limit any immunity provided under subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the duration of a declared state of emergency, pursuant to a proclamation of emergency issued pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code,
 the board may suspend compliance with any provision of this chapter or regulation adopted thereunder that would adversely affect a licensee’s ability to provide emergency services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 27.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1627.7.

(a) A dentist shall not be liable for damages for injury or death caused in an emergency situation occurring in the dentist’s office or in a hospital on account of a failure to inform a patient of the possible consequences of a dental procedure where the failure to inform is caused by any of the following: 

(1) The patient was unconscious.

(2) The dental procedure was undertaken without the consent of the patient because the dentist reasonably believed that a dental procedure should be undertaken immediately and that there was
 insufficient time to fully inform the patient. 

(3) A dental procedure was performed on a person legally incapable of giving consent, and the dentist reasonably believed that a dental procedure should be undertaken immediately and that there was insufficient time to obtain the informed consent of a person authorized to give such consent for the patient.

(b) This section is applicable only to actions for damages for injuries or death arising because of a dentist’s failure to inform, and not to actions for such damages arising because of a dentist’s negligence in rendering or failing to render treatment.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Dentist” means a person licensed as a dentist pursuant to this chapter. 

(2) “Emergency situation occurring in a hospital” means a situation occurring in a hospital, whether or not it occurs in an emergency room, requiring immediate services for alleviation of severe pain or immediate diagnosis and treatment of unforeseeable dental conditions, which, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death.

(3) “Hospital” means a licensed general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Emergency situation occurring in the dentist’s office” means a situation occurring in an office, other than a hospital, used by the dentist for the examination or treatment of patients, requiring immediate services for alleviation of severe pain, or immediate diagnosis and treatment of unforeseeable dental conditions, which,
 if not immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 412.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.

Any person over 18 years of age is eligible to take an examination before the board upon making application therefor and meeting all of the following requirements:

(a) Paying the fee for applicants for examination provided by this chapter.

(b) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having graduated from a dental college approved by the board or by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and presenting satisfactory evidence of having completed at dental school or schools the full number of academic years of undergraduate courses required for graduation. For purposes of
 this article, “dental college approved by the board” or “approved dental school” include a foreign dental school accredited by a body that has a reciprocal accreditation agreement with any commission or accreditation organization whose findings are accepted by the board.

(c) Furnishing the satisfactory evidence of financial responsibility or liability insurance for injuries sustained or claimed to be sustained by a dental patient in the course of the examination as a result of the applicant’s actions.

(d) If the applicant has been issued a degree of doctor of dental medicine or doctor of dental surgery by a foreign dental school, the applicant shall furnish all of the following documentary evidence to the board:

(1) That the applicant has completed, in a dental school or schools approved by the board pursuant to Section 1636.4, a resident course of professional instruction in dentistry for the full number of academic years of undergraduate courses required for graduation.

(2) Subsequent thereto, the applicant has been issued by the dental school a dental diploma or a dental degree, as evidence of the successful completion of the course of dental instruction required for graduation.

(e) Any applicant who has been issued a dental diploma from a foreign dental school that has not, at the time of the applicant’s graduation from the school, been approved by the board pursuant to Section 1636.4 shall not be eligible for examination until the applicant has successfully completed a minimum
 of two academic years of education at a dental college approved by the board pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1024) of Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations and has been issued a degree of doctor of dental medicine or doctor of dental surgery or its equivalent. This subdivision shall not apply to applicants who have successfully completed the requirements of Section 1636 as it read before it was repealed on January 1, 2004, on or before December 31, 2003, or who have successfully completed the requirements of Section 1628.2 on or before December 31, 2008. An applicant who has successfully completed the requirements of Section 1636 as it read before it was repealed on January 1, 2004, on or before December 31, 2003, or who has successfully completed the requirements of Section 1628.2 on or before December 31, 2008, shall be eligible to take the
 examination required by Section 1632, subject to the limitations set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1633.

(f) Subdivisions (d) and (e) do not apply to a person who has been issued a degree of doctor of dental medicine or doctor of dental surgery by a foreign dental school accredited by a body that has a reciprocal accreditation agreement with any commission or accreditation organization whose findings are accepted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 28.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.5.

The board may deny an application to take an examination for licensure as a dentist or dental auxiliary or an application for registration as a dental corporation, or, at any time prior to licensure, the board may deny the issuance of a license to an applicant for licensure as a dentist or dental auxiliary, if the applicant has been convicted of a crime or subject
 to formal discipline pursuant to Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 29.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.7.

(a) The board may deny licensure to any applicant who is guilty of unprofessional conduct or of any cause that would subject a licensee to revocation or suspension of their license. The board may, upon an applicant’s successful completion of the board’s licensure requirements, in its sole discretion, issue a probationary license to an applicant for licensure as a dentist or dental auxiliary. The board may require, as a term or condition of issuing the probationary license, the applicant to do any of the following, including, but not limited to:

(1) Successfully complete a professional competency examination.

(2) Submit to a medical or psychological evaluation.

(3) Submit to continuing medical or psychological treatment.

(4) Abstain from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(5) Submit to random fluid testing for alcohol or controlled substance abuse.

(6) Submit to continuing participation in a board-approved rehabilitation program.

(7) Restrict the type or circumstances of practice.

(8) Submit to continuing education and coursework.

(9) Comply with requirements regarding notification to employer and changes of employment.

(10) Comply with probation monitoring.

(11) Comply with all laws and regulations governing the practice of dentistry.

(12) Limit practice to a supervised structured environment in which the licensee’s activities shall be supervised by another dentist.

(13) Submit to total or partial restrictions on drug prescribing privileges.

(b) The board shall provide the decision placing the applicant on probation in plain view on the board’s internet website.

(c) Unless otherwise specified by the board, the term of probation shall be for three years and the licensee may petition the board for early termination, or modification of a condition of, the probation in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1686.

(d) An applicant shall not be eligible to reapply for licensure for a minimum of one year from the effective date of the denial of their application.

(e) Upon successful completion of all terms and conditions of probation or termination of the probationary terms and conditions pursuant to subdivision (c), the board may issue an unrestricted license to the licensee.

(f) Adjudication under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not be required to issue a probationary license pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 3.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1629.

(a) Any member of the board may inquire of any applicant for examination concerning the applicant’s qualifications or experience and may take testimony of anyone in regard thereto, under oath, which the member is hereby empowered to administer.

(b) Each applicant for licensure under this chapter shall furnish
 either fingerprint cards or a copy of a completed Live Scan form for submission to state and federal criminal justice agencies, including, but not limited to, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in order to establish the identity of the applicant and in order to determine whether the applicant has a record of any criminal convictions in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries. The information obtained as a result of the fingerprinting of the applicant shall be used in accordance with Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Section 1628.5. The board shall request the subsequent arrest notification service for all applicants pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(c) Each applicant for licensure to practice dentistry shall furnish a signed release allowing disclosure of information from the National Practitioner Data Bank and verification of registration status with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration within the United States Department of Justice. The board shall review this information to determine if it presents sufficient evidence of a violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670) to warrant the submission of additional information from the applicant or the denial of the application for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 30.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1630.

The examination of applicants for a license to practice dentistry in this state, as described in Section 1632, shall be sufficiently thorough to test the fitness of the applicant to practice dentistry, and shall include assessing competency in the areas of diagnosis, treatment planning, and restorative, endodontic, periodontic, and prosthetic dentistry. Both questions and answers shall be written in the English language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 31.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.

(a) The board shall require each applicant to successfully complete the written examination of the National Board Dental Examination of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations.

(b) The board shall require each applicant to successfully complete an examination in California law and ethics developed and administered by the board. The board shall provide a separate application for this examination. The board shall ensure that the law and ethics examination reflects current law and regulations, and ensure that the examinations are randomized. Applicants shall submit this application and required fee to the board in order to take this examination. In addition to the aforementioned application, the only other requirement for taking this examination shall be
 certification from the dean of the qualifying dental school or the dean’s delegate attended by the applicant that the applicant has graduated, or will graduate, or is expected to graduate. Applicants who submit completed applications and certification from the dean at least 15 days prior to a scheduled examination shall be scheduled to take the examination. Successful results of the examination shall, as established by board regulation, remain valid for two years from the date that the applicant is notified of having passed the examination.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1632.5, the board shall require each applicant to have taken and received a passing score on one of the following:

(1) A clinical and written examination administered by the Western Regional Examining Board within five years prior to the date of their application for a license under this section.

(2) The clinical and written examination developed by the American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc., within five years prior to the date of their application for a license under this section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1628, the board is authorized to do either of the following:

(1) Approve an application for examination from, and to examine an applicant who is enrolled in, but has not yet graduated from, a reputable dental school approved by the board.

(2) Accept the results of an examination described in subdivision (c) submitted by an applicant who was enrolled in, but had not graduated from, a reputable dental school approved by the board at the time the examination was administered.

In
 either case, the board shall require the dean of that school or the dean’s delegate to furnish satisfactory proof that the applicant will graduate within one year of the date the examination was administered.

(e) The board may determine the testing format, as related to patients, for the examination provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 4.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.5.

(a) Prior to implementation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632, the department’s Office of Professional Examination Services shall review the Western Regional Examining Board examination to ensure compliance with the requirements of Section 139 and to certify that the examination process meets those standards. If the department determines that the examination process fails to meet those standards, paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632 shall not be implemented.

(b) The Western Regional Examining Board examination process shall be regularly reviewed by the department pursuant to Section 139.

(c) The Western Regional Examining Board examination shall meet the mandates of
 subdivision (a) of Section 12944 of the Government Code.

(d) As part of its next scheduled sunset review by the appropriate committees of the Legislature, the Dental Board of California shall report to that committee and the department on the pass rates of applicants who sat for the Western Regional Examining Board examination, compared with the pass rates of applicants who sat for the state clinical and written examination administered by the Dental Board of California. This report shall be a component of the evaluation of the examination process that is based on psychometrically sound principles for establishing minimum qualifications and levels of competency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 6.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.55.

(a) Prior to implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632, the department’s Office of Professional Examination Services shall review the American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. examination to ensure compliance with the requirements of Section 139 and to certify that the examination process meets those standards, and deliver this review to the Dental Board of California. If the department determines that the examination process fails to meet those standards, does not deliver the review to the Dental Board of California, or if the American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. fails to pay the costs and expenses the board incurs, as described in subdivision (d), paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632 shall not be implemented.

(b) The
 American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. examination process shall be regularly reviewed by the department pursuant to Section 139.

(c) The American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. examination shall meet the mandates of subdivision (a) of Section 12944 of the Government Code.

(d) The American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses the board incurs for the purposes of implementing this section.

(e) The American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc. examination may only be accepted for licensure by a candidate after it is determined that the examination has met the requirements of this section. Examinations taken prior to that date may not be used for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 7.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.6.

(a) As part of the ongoing implementation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632, the board shall review the portfolio examination to ensure compliance with the requirements of Section 139 and to certify that the portfolio examination process meets those requirements. If the board determines that the portfolio examination fails to meet those requirements, paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632 shall cease to be implemented and the portfolio examination will no longer be an option for applicants. The board’s review and certification or determination shall be completed and submitted to the Legislature and the department by December 1, 2016.

(b) A report to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on December 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 446, Sec. 5.   (AB 1524)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Inoperative December 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.7.

The Department of Finance may accept funds pursuant to Sections 11005.1 and 16302 of the Government Code for the purposes of reviewing and analyzing the examination developed by the American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc., as described in Section 1632.55.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 572, Sec. 3.   (AB 2331)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.

(a) When an applicant for a license has received a grading of 85 percent or above in any given subject, the applicant shall be exempt from reexamination on that subject in subsequent examinations before the board within two years after the examination on which the applicant received the exemption.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 135, an applicant who fails to pass the examination required by Section 1632 after three attempts shall not be eligible for further reexamination until the applicant has successfully completed a minimum of 50 hours of education for each subject which the applicant failed in the applicant’s last unsuccessful examination. The
 coursework shall be taken at a dental school approved by either the Commission on Dental Accreditation or a comparable organization approved by the board, and shall be completed within a period of one year from the date of notification of the applicant’s third failure.

(c) The coursework described in subdivision (b) shall be required once for every three unsuccessful examination attempts. When the applicant applies for reexamination, the applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board that the applicant has successfully completed the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 33.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1634.

A person successfully passing the examination shall be registered as a licensed dentist on the board register, as provided in Section 1612, and shall be granted by the board a license to practice dentistry in the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

1634.1.

Notwithstanding Section 1634, the board may grant a license to practice dentistry to an applicant who submits all of the following to the board:

(a) A completed application form and all fees required by the board.

(b) Satisfactory evidence of having graduated from a dental school approved by a national accrediting body approved by the board or by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.

(c) Satisfactory evidence of having completed a clinically based advanced education program in general dentistry or an advanced education program in general practice residency that is, at minimum, one year in duration and is accredited by
 either the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or a national accrediting body approved by the board. The advanced education program shall include a certification of clinical residency program completion approved by the board, to be completed upon the resident’s successful completion of the program in order to evaluate the resident’s competence to practice dentistry in the state. The certification shall be within two years prior to the date of the resident’s application for a license under this section. Completion of the program shall be within two years prior to the date of their application for a license under this section.

(d) Satisfactory evidence of having successfully completed the written examination of the National Board Dental Examination of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations.

(e) Satisfactory evidence of having
 successfully completed an examination in California law and ethics.

(f) Proof that the applicant has not failed a state, regional, or national examination for licensure to practice dentistry under this chapter within five years prior to the date of the application for a license under this chapter. If the applicant subsequently passed the examination for licensure, the prior failure shall not make the applicant ineligible under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 8.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1634.2.

(a) An advanced education program’s compliance with subdivision (c) of Section 1634.1 shall be regularly reviewed by the department pursuant to Section 139.

(b) An advanced education program described in subdivision (c) of Section 1634.1 shall meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 12944 of the Government Code.

(c) The clinical residency program completion certification required by subdivision (c) of Section 1634.1 shall include a list of core competencies commensurate to those found in the board’s examinations. The board, together with the department’s Office of Professional Examination Services, shall ensure the alignment of the competencies stated in the clinical residency program completion certification with the board’s current occupational analysis. The board shall implement use of the clinical residency program completion certification form and use of the core competency list through the adoption of emergency regulations by January 1, 2008.

(d) As part of its next scheduled review after January 1, 2007, by the Joint Committee on Boards, Commissions and Consumer Protection, the board shall report to that committee and to the department the number of complaints received for those
 dentists who have obtained licensure by passing the state clinical examination and for those dentists who have obtained licensure through an advanced education program. The report shall also contain tracking information on these complaints and their disposition. This report shall be a component of the evaluation of the examination process that is based on psychometrically sound principles for establishing minimum qualifications and levels of competency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 6.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1635.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1634, the board may grant a license to practice dentistry to an applicant who has not taken an examination before the board, if the applicant submits all of the following to the board:

(1) A completed application form and all fees required by the board.

(2) Proof of an active and unrestricted license issued by another state, district, or territory of the United States to practice dentistry that is not subject to any current or pending disciplinary action such as revocation, suspension, or probation.

(3) Proof that the applicant has either been in active clinical
 practice in another state, district, or territory of the United States, has been engaged in full-time nonclinical practice requiring an active dentist’s license for federal, state, or local public health programs in another state, district, or territory of the United States for at least five years immediately preceding the application, or has been a full-time faculty member in an accredited dental education program and in active clinical practice for a total of at least 5,000 hours within the past five years immediately preceding the date of the application under this section. The clinical practice requirement may be met by submitting documentation of any of the following:

(A) If the applicant has completed a residency training program accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation, including, but not limited to, a general practice residency, an advanced education in general dentistry program, or a training
 program in a specialty recognized by the American Dental Association, the applicant may receive credit of 1,000 hours for each year, up to 2,000 hours, of clinical practice completed in the residency training program.

(B) The applicant agrees to practice dentistry full time for a minimum of 32 hours per week for two years in at least one primary care clinic licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code or primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or a clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system, or a clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by the authorized agent of the clinic, verifying compliance with this requirement.
 The board may periodically request verification of compliance with these requirements.

(C) The applicant agrees to teach or practice dentistry in California for a minimum average of 40 hours per week for two years in at least one accredited dental education program approved by the board. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by the authorized agent of the program, verifying compliance with this requirement. The board may periodically request verification of compliance with these requirements.

(4) Proof that the applicant has not been subject to disciplinary action by any state in which the applicant is or has been previously licensed to practice dentistry. If the applicant has been subject to disciplinary action, the board shall review that action to determine if it presents sufficient evidence of a violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670) to
 warrant the submission of additional information from the applicant or the denial of the application for licensure.

(5) A signed release allowing the disclosure of information from the National Practitioner Data Bank and the verification of registration status with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration. The board shall review this information to determine if it presents sufficient evidence of a violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670) to warrant the submission of additional information from the applicant or the denial of the application for licensure.

(6) Proof that the applicant has not failed a state, regional, or national examination for licensure to practice dentistry under this chapter within five years prior to the date of the application for a license under this section. If the applicant subsequently passed the examination for licensure, the prior failure
 shall not make the applicant ineligible under this paragraph.

(7) An acknowledgment by the applicant executed under penalty of perjury and automatic forfeiture of license, of the following:

(A) That the information provided by the applicant to the board is true and correct, to the best of their knowledge and belief.

(B) That the applicant has not been convicted of an offense involving conduct that would violate Section 810.

(8) Documentation of 50 units of continuing education completed within two years of the date of the application under this section. The continuing education shall include the mandatory coursework prescribed by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1645.

(9) Any other information as specified by the board to the extent it is required of applicants for licensure by examination under this article.

(b) The board shall provide in the application packet to each out-of-state dentist pursuant to this section the following information:

(1) The location of dental personnel shortage areas that exist in the state.
